Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 2 Deeds, Mortgages and Leases Generally
§ 34-2-121.
Conveyance and encumbrance of homesteads void unless spouse joins; exception.

Every owner or occupant of a homestead as established herein may voluntarily sell, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of or encumber the same; provided the instrument of writing conveying, mortgaging, disposing of or encumbering such homestead shall contain in substance the following words: “Hereby releasing and waiving all rights under and by virtue of the homestead exemption laws of this state”, and shall be freely and voluntarily signed and acknowledged by the owner and the spouse of the owner of said homestead. The foregoing provisions shall not be applicable to nor shall compliance therewith be required for full legal effectiveness of any conveyance of property directly from husband to wife.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 436; R.S. 1887, § 2784; R.S. 1899, § 2770; C.S. 1910, § 3662; Laws 1913, ch. 18, § 1; 1919, ch. 97, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4619; R.S. 1931, § 97-205; Laws 1941, ch. 42, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 66-209; Laws 1949, ch. 72, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 34-53.

Cross references. —

As to homestead exemption generally, see §

1-20-101

et seq.

History of section. —

Section 5, ch. 62, C.L. 1876, was similar to this section, in its original form, and was amended by § 2, ch. 83, Laws 1886. This section was originally enacted as part of the civil code, ch. 60, Laws 1886. For the remaining portions of the civil code relating to homesteads, see §§

1-20-101

to

1-20-104

.

Section 5 (last paragraph) of ch. 93, Laws 1895, was similar to the above. It read: “No deed or other instrument shall be construed as releasing the right of homestead, unless the same shall contain a clause expressly releasing or waiving such right. And in such case the certificate of acknowledgment shall contain a clause as follows, ‘including the release and waiver of the right of homestead,’ or other words which will expressly show that the parties executing the deed or other instrument intended to release such right. And no release or waiver of the right of homestead by the husband shall bind the wife unless she join in such release or waiver.”

Repeal of provision concerning waiver of homestead. —

Section 66-207, W.C.S. 1945, concerning the right of a grantor to waive homestead exemption, was repealed by § 1, ch. 72, Laws 1949.

Waiver requirements include all homestead property, and are not limited to real property.

Geist v. Converse County Bank, 79 B.R. 939, 1987 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 10402 (D. Wyo. 1987).

In Wyoming the homestead can only be sold or incumbered with the consent of the wife,

she being required to join in the mortgage or deed; and the right of homestead is to the extent of $1,500, the proceeds upon the sale thereof being exempt from execution or attachment, as well as the homestead itself. From this statement may be inferred the right of exemption of proceeds from sales made other than by execution. United States v. Field, 190 F. Supp. 216, 1960 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3168 (D. Wyo. 1960).

But conveyance without consent is not void as to amount over $4,000.00. —

A deed by the owner without the consent of his or her spouse, conveying property embracing a homestead, but of a value in excess of $4,000.00, is not void as to the excess. Stolldorf v. Stolldorf, 384 P.2d 969,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1963).

Proceeds arising from sale of a homestead not exceeding the statutory allowance are exempt. —

No judgment or other claim against the owner of the homestead is a lien against the same in the hands of a bona fide purchaser for a valuable consideration, and the proceeds arising from the sale of a homestead not exceeding the statutory allowance are exempt, and any subsequent homestead acquired by such proceeds is also exempt. United States v. Field, 190 F. Supp. 216, 1960 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3168 (D. Wyo. 1960).

Clause required to convey homestead interest. —

Since enactment of ch. 19, Laws 1895, to make valid conveyance of homestead or to release homestead interest, it has been necessary that body of instrument and certificate of acknowledgment contain clause expressly releasing or waiving homestead right. Jones v. Losekamp, 19 Wyo. 83, 114 P. 673,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1911) (construing § 66-207, W.C.S. 1945).

Acknowledgment necessary to pass homestead right. —

A mortgage in which the acknowledgment is not taken as required is ineffectual to pass homestead right. First Nat'l Bank v. Citizens' State Bank, 11 Wyo. 32, 70 P. 726,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1902) (construing § 66-207, W.C.S. 1945).

Homestead right not extinguished by death of wife. —

One who has acquired a homestead does not lose his right to exemption by the death of his wife, childless, if he continues to occupy the premises as a home. Towne v. Rumsey, 5 Wyo. 11, 35 P. 1025,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1894).

Partnership funds used to purchase homestead. —

Where the other partner consents, a homestead may be purchased with partnership funds for a partner and his wife. State Bank v. Bagley Bros., 44 Wyo. 244, 11 P.2d 572,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 44 Wyo. 456, 13 P.2d 564,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1932).

And wife's signature necessary to mortgage for partnership debt. —

Property purchased with partnership funds was in fact the homestead of a deceased partner and mortgage thereon to secure partnership debts was void as to the partner's wife, who did not sign the mortgage. State Bank v. Bagley Bros., 44 Wyo. 244, 11 P.2d 572,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 44 Wyo. 456, 13 P.2d 564,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1932).

Mortgage securing purchase price is superior to homestead right. —

A mortgage by a grantee to a third person for money loaned to pay the purchase price of homestead, as well as a purchase money mortgage to the grantor, is excepted from homestead exemption laws. Powers v. Pense, 20 Wyo. 327, 123 P. 925,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1912) (construing § 66-207, W.C.S. 1945).

And purchaser at foreclosure sale gets superior rights. —

Rights of purchaser at mortgage foreclosure sale held superior to the homestead exemption rights of the wife where the money had been advanced in order that the property might be redeemed from a purchase money foreclosure. Powers v. Pense, 20 Wyo. 327, 123 P. 925,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1912) (construing § 66-207, W.C.S. 1945).

Where the mortgage lien is superior to the homestead right, the lien of the purchaser at foreclosure sale is also superior. Powers v. Pense, 20 Wyo. 327, 123 P. 925,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1912) (construing § 66-207, W.C.S. 1945).

Absent waiver, no attachment of nonpurchase-money lien. —

A consensual, but nonpurchase-money, lien does not attach to the first $10,000 in value of a debtor's homestead unless it is accompanied by an informed, voluntary and specific waiver of the homestead exemption. In re VanGorp, 128 B.R. 579, 1991 Bankr. LEXIS 881 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1991).

Homestead exemption denied. —

One who did not reside on the land, nor occupy it as his homestead, and made no claim of homestead exemption until long after execution of a deed thereto, could not claim exemption as against the grantees. Harney v. Montgomery, 29 Wyo. 362, 213 P. 378,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1923).

Occupant of homestead as proper defendant in ejectment action. —

Widow who occupied mortgaged premises, claiming them as homestead in her individual, not representative, capacity was a proper party defendant in an ejectment action. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

Effect of former provision requiring officer to apprise wife of her rights. —

Before the 1949 amendment this section required the officer taking a wife's acknowledgment of a conveyance or encumbrance of homestead to apprise her of her right and the effect of signing and acknowledging the instrument. This provision was held not to apply to a widow, since it was intended to protect a wife against undue influence on the part of her husband. Goodson v. Smith, 69 Wyo. 439, 243 P.2d 163,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1952).

Notary was not required to advise wife concerning her rights and effect of signing and acknowledging deed, where wife failed to examine instrument, saying she knew all about the matter, and where husband advised notary wife was sick and that notary should not stay longer than necessary. Rowray v. Atlas Realty Co., 48 Wyo. 264, 45 P.2d 18,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1935).

Quoted

in

Burnell v. Roush, 404 P.2d 836,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1965); Gregory v. Sanders, 635 P.2d 795,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 384

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

Adams v. Smith, 11 Wyo. 200, 70 P. 1043,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1903); Whalon v. North Platte Canal & Colonization Co., 11 Wyo. 313, 71 P. 995,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1903); Ohio Oil Co. v. Wyoming Agency, 63 Wyo. 187, 179 P.2d 773,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1947); Strom v. Felton, 76 Wyo. 370, 302 P.2d 917,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(1956).

Law reviews. —

See note, “The Spouse as a Stranger to the Deed,” 14 Wyo. L.J. 61 (1959).

See note, “Should Marital Rights Be Protected by Statute?,” 19 Wyo. L.J. 14 (1964).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Recovery of damages for breach of contract to convey homestead where only one spouse signed contract, 5 ALR4th 1310.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
131.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 34-2-122.
Notice of trust or representative capacity of grantee.

In all instruments conveying real estate, or interests therein, in which the grantee is described as trustee, agent, or as in any other representative capacity, the instruments of conveyance shall also define the trust or other agreement under which the grantee is acting. In all instruments conveying real estate, or interests therein, in which the grantee is described as a trust, the instrument of conveyance shall also define the trust or other instrument and shall be deemed to have vested title in the trustee or trustees of the trust. For purposes of this section, it shall be sufficient to define a trust by providing in the text of the instrument the name of the trustee or trustees and the name of the trust, the date of the trust or other agreement, or by referring by proper description of the affecting record book, page, document number or file, to the instrument, order, decree or other writing, which is of public record in the county in which the land so conveyed is located and in which the required information appears; otherwise the description of a grantee in any representative capacity in each instrument of conveyance shall be considered and held to be a description of the grantee, only, and shall not be notice of any trust, agency or other representative capacity of the grantee who shall be held as vested with the power to convey, transfer, encumber or release the affected title. Whenever the grantee shall execute and deliver a conveyance, transfer, encumbrance or release of the property in a representative capacity, it shall not thereafter be questioned by anyone claiming as a beneficiary under the trust or agency or by anyone claiming by, through or under any undisclosed beneficiary. Trust property in the name of the trustee, agent or representative and owned only in that capacity shall not be subject to execution for the grantee’s individual obligations.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 154, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-54; Laws 1992, ch. 16, § 1.

Naming of beneficiaries. —

Where the warranty deed conveyed property from husband and wife to their revocable trust that was executed the same day, the deed complied with the plain requirement of the statute because the statute requires the deed to name the beneficiaries only when the grantee is a trustee or other individual agent. In re Estate of Lohrie, 950 P.2d 1030,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1997).

Dates. —

Because the “Deed of Trust Contract” failed to state the date of the trust instrument, it did not create a valid trust under Wyoming law.
2010 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 141819.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of trust instrument which fails to designate respective interests of beneficiaries, 87 ALR3d 925.

§ 34-2-123.
Notice of trust or representative capacity of grantee; prior conveyances.

Any instrument which complies with this act [§§

34-2-122

and

34-2-123

] shall be effective regardless of when it was executed or recorded. All instruments of conveyance to, or transfer, encumbrance or release of, lands or any interest therein within the state of Wyoming, which name a grantee in a representative capacity, or name a trust as grantee, and which fail to provide the information required by W.S.

34-2-122

, shall cease to be notice of any trust or representative capacity of the grantee and shall be considered and held to be a description of the grantee only, who shall be held to have individually, the full power to convey, transfer, encumber or release the affected title and no conveyance, transfer, encumbrance or release shall thereafter be questioned by anyone claiming with respect to the affected property, as a beneficiary or by anyone claiming by, through, or under an undisclosed beneficiary, provided that this section shall not apply if the grantee or any beneficiary or beneficiaries or other properly interested person shall file for record in the proper office of the county in which the land is situated, a statement, duly verified, describing the affected lands and interest therein, setting forth the interest of the person or entity making the statement, defining the representative relationship, and setting forth the information required by W.S. 34-2-122, or referring by proper description to an instrument of public record in the county in which the matters shall appear. The identity of any successor trustee may be established by a recorded statement, duly verified, of the successor trustee specifying his name and address and the date and circumstances of his succession, and confirming that he is currently lawfully serving in that capacity.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 154, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 34-55; Laws 1992, ch. 16, § 1.

Naming of beneficiaries. —

Where the warranty deed conveyed property from husband and wife to their revocable trust that was executed the same day, the deed complied with the plain requirement of the statute because the statute requires the deed to name the beneficiaries only when the grantee is a trustee or other individual agent. In re Estate of Lohrie, 950 P.2d 1030,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 34-2-124.
Priority of mortgages or specific liens on realty.

A mortgage or other specific lien on real property shall take precedence over the lien of taxes levied against any other property than the property subject to such lien.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 94, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4655; R.S. 1931, § 71-227; C.S. 1945, § 66-210; W.S. 1957, § 34-56.

Cross references. —

For provision that materialmen's liens may be enforced by removal of improvements, see §

29-2-103

.

As to priority of lien in connection with mines and minerals to prior perfected lien, see §

29-3-107

.

As to priority of lien of harvesters with reference to mortgages, etc., see §

29-5-104

.

As to liens on real estate for taxes, see §

39-13-108

.

Effect of section. —

Section 2, ch. 94, Laws 1919, provides that the act shall be deemed declaratory of the existing law.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Priority between vendor's lien and mortgage or deed of trust to third person furnishing purchase money, 55 ALR2d 1119.

Priority between mechanics' lien and purchase-money mortgage, 73 ALR2d 1407.

Special or local assessment as superior over earlier private lien or mortgage, where statute creating such special lien is silent as to superiority, 75 ALR2d 1121.

Priority between advances made under previously executed mortgage and mechanics' lien, 80 ALR2d 179.

Priority between federal tax lien and mortgage to secure future advances or expenditures by mortgagee, 90 ALR2d 1179.

Right of vendee under executory land contract to lien for amount paid on purchase price as against subsequent creditors of purchasers from vendor, 82 ALR3d 1040.

§ 34-2-125.
Private seals.

Hereafter it shall not be necessary to use private seals on any instrument in this state.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 93, § 5 1/2; C.S. 1945, § 66-214; W.S. 1957, § 34-57.

History of section. —

This section seems not to have been carried in any compilation prior to 1945.

Earlier compilations carried § 1, ch. 71, Laws 1890 (R.S. 1931, § 97-122), which read: “The use of private seals in written contracts except those of corporations, is abolished, and the addition of a private seal to an instrument of writing shall not affect its character in any respect.”

The 1895 act was substituted by the 1945 compiler on the ground that it was later in point of time.

Presence of private seal. —

Under this section and §§

34-2-126

and

34-2-127

, presence of an unnecessary private seal on writing does not entitle its recitals to any effect that they would not have had without it. Natrona Power Co. v. Clark, 31 Wyo. 284, 225 P. 586,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1924).

§ 34-2-126.
Unsealed writings.

There shall be no difference in evidence between sealed and unsealed writings and every writing not sealed shall have the same force and effect that it would have if sealed. A writing under seal may, therefore, be changed or altogether discharged by a writing not under seal. An agreement in writing without seal for the compromise or settlement of a debt is as obligatory as if the seal were affixed.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 71, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2750; C.S. 1910, § 3642; C.S. 1920, § 4598; R.S. 1931, § 97-123; C.S. 1945, § 66-215; W.S. 1957, § 34-58.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Nash v. Cowhick, 9 Wyo. 93, 60 P. 265,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1900); Natrona Power Co. v. Clark, 31 Wyo. 284, 225 P. 586,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1924); Carey v. Jackson, 603 P.2d 868,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 493

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 34-2-127.
Recitals in instruments.

Recitals in any written instrument shall have no greater effect than they have heretofore had in writings not under seal.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 71, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 2751; C.S. 1910, § 3643; C.S. 1920, § 4599; R.S. 1931, § 97-124; C.S. 1945, § 66-216; W.S. 1957, § 34-59.

Cited

in

Natrona Power Co. v. Clark, 31 Wyo. 284, 225 P. 586,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1924).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Written matter as controlling printed matter in resolving inconsistencies between habendum and other clauses, 37 ALR2d 820.

Intent of parties as determining effect of conflict between granting and habendum clauses as to estate conveyed, 58 ALR2d 1374.

Conflict between granting and habendum clauses as to estate conveyed, 58 ALR2d 1374.

Deed to railroad company as conveying fee or easement, 6 ALR3d 973.

Rights, under oil and gas lease, deed or sales contract, to “distillate,” “condensate,” or “natural gasoline,” 38 ALR3d 983.

Description in deed as relating to magnetic or true meridian, 70 ALR3d 1220.

§ 34-2-128.
No implied tenancy except by sufferance.

In this state there shall not exist the relations of landlord and tenant, by implication or operation of law, except a tenancy by sufferance. Upon the expiration of a term created by lease, either verbal or written, there shall be no implied renewal of the same, for any period of time whatever, either by the tenant holding over or by the landlord accepting compensation or rent for or during any period of such holding over. Such holding over by the tenant and acceptance of rent by the landlord shall constitute only a tenancy by sufferance, with the rights, duties, obligations and incidents of such tenancy.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 72, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1386; R.S. 1899, § 2772; C.S. 1910, § 3664; C.S. 1920, § 4621; R.S. 1931, § 97-207; C.S. 1945, § 66-219; W.S. 1957, § 34-60.

Tenancy after lease expires is tenancy by sufferance. —

District court
did not err in granting summary judgment in favor of defendant on
plaintiff's claim that defendant deprived him of a constitutionally-protected
property right by excluding him from a medical office suite, because
defendant was a tenant by sufferance after the lease expired and had
no property rights. Brecheen v. Lofaro, 559 Fed. Appx. 723, 2014 U.S. App. LEXIS 9416 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2014).

Possession indicates tenancy by sufferance. —

One in possession of property is, in absence of any other showing, a mere tenant by sufferance, so that such possession cannot be regarded as imparting vitality to a lease the conditions of which have not been complied with, nor as a part performance of a contract for the occupancy of land. Frank v. Stratford-Handcock, 13 Wyo. 37, 77 P. 134,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1904).

Tenancy after lease expires is tenancy by sufferance. —

Under this section and §

34-2-129

, tenant's occupancy of premises after expiration of lease, without any new understanding, continued as “tenant by sufferance.” Lawer v. Mitts, 33 Wyo. 249, 238 P. 654,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1925).

Tenant after expiration of written lease is only tenant by sufferance. Hitshew v. Rosson, 41 Wyo. 509, 287 P. 316,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1930).

And notice to quit unnecessary. —

Where oral lease expired Sept. 1, 1942, but tenants remained in apartment under oral agreement, at increased rent while looking for other apartment, only tenancy by sufferance remained and notice to quit was unnecessary. Welch v. Rice, 61 Wyo. 511, 159 P.2d 502,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1945).

Right of peaceable reentry. —

Where landlord gave notice to tenants by sufferance to quit apartment, tenants became trespassers at expiration of period set and landlord was entitled to enter apartment peaceably and remove such trespasser's property therefrom. Welch v. Rice, 61 Wyo. 511, 159 P.2d 502,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1945).

Termination by reentry. —

Tenancy by sufferance can be terminated by reentry or any affirmative action on landlord's part which indicates he desires tenant to surrender premises and notice to quit is not necessary unless required by statute. Welch v. Rice, 61 Wyo. 511, 159 P.2d 502,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1945).

Or by action in forcible entry and unlawful detainer. —

Administrator of deceased landlord, after serving on tenant by sufferance notice to quit in due time and sufficient in form and substance, may recover possession in forcible entry and unlawful detainer. Hitshew v. Rosson, 41 Wyo. 509, 287 P. 316,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1930).

Cited

in

Goddard v. State, 481 P.2d 343,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1971).

Law reviews. —

See comment, “Application of Wyoming Statutes: Section 34-60 [§

34-2-128

] (1957) — The Possibility of Implied Tenancies Other Than Tenancies by Sufferance in Wyoming,” VI Land & Water L. Rev. 553 (1971).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Farmland cultivation arrangement as creating status of landlord-tenant or landowner-cropper, 95 ALR3d 1013.

Waiver or estoppel as to notice requirement for exercising option to renew or extend lease, 32 ALR4th 452.

Lessor's retention of past-due rental payments as precluding termination of lease and dispossession of lessee for nonpayment of rent, 39 ALR4th 1204.

What constitutes abandonment of residential or commercial lease — modern cases, 84 ALR4th 183.

What constitutes tenant's holding over of leased premises, 13 ALR5th 169.

Landlord's permitting third party to occupy premises rent-free as acceptance of tenant's surrender of premises, 18 ALR5th 437.

§ 34-2-129.
Leases; renewal.

No lease which shall have expired by its own limitation shall be again renewed except by express contract in writing, signed by the parties thereto, whether the original lease be written or verbal. Nor shall any other tenancy than that by sufferance exist after the termination of the original lease, unless created as aforesaid, by express contract in writing.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 72, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1387; R.S. 1899, § 2773; C.S. 1910, § 3665; C.S. 1920, § 4622; R.S. 1931, § 97-208; C.S. 1945, § 66-220; W.S. 1957, § 34-61.

Renewals must be in writing and signed. —

Where a lease
on medical office space expired according to its terms, handwritten
notations were insufficient to successfully modify terms of lease
agreement. The lease provisions were consistent with Wyoming law which
required lease renewals to be in writing and signed by the parties. Brecheen v. Lofaro, 559 Fed. Appx. 723, 2014 U.S. App. LEXIS 9416 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2014).

No implied renewal of lease. —

Upon expiration of term created by lease, either verbal or written, there can be no implied renewal under the statute for any period of time whatever, and a judgment for rent after expiration of term was erroneous. McNamara v. O'Brien, 2 Wyo. 447,

1881 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1881).

Notice to quit unnecessary. —

Where oral lease expired Sept. 1, 1942, but tenants remained in apartment under oral agreement, at increased rent while looking for other apartment, only tenancy by sufferance remained and notice to quit was unnecessary. Welch v. Rice, 61 Wyo. 511, 159 P.2d 502,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1945).

Right of peaceable reentry. —

Where landlord gave notice to tenants by sufferance to quit apartment, tenants became trespassers at expiration of period set and landlord was entitled to enter apartment peaceably and remove such trespasser's property therefrom. Welch v. Rice, 61 Wyo. 511, 159 P.2d 502,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1945).

Exercise of right of reentry not conversion of tenant's personal property. —

A tenant holding over after the expiration of his lease became a tenant by sufferance under this section and §

34-2-128

, and the landlord had the right of peaceful reentry, and the landlord was not guilty of conversion of the tenant's personal property on the premises in exercising such right, or in removing the property to a warehouse subject to the tenant's order. Vissenberg v. Bresnahen, 65 Wyo. 367, 202 P.2d 663,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1949).

Tenancy terminated by reentry. —

Tenancy by sufferance can be terminated by reentry or any affirmative action on landlord's part which indicates he desires tenant to surrender premises and notice to quit is not necessary unless required by statute. Welch v. Rice, 61 Wyo. 511, 159 P.2d 502,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1945).

Cited

in

Lawer v. Mitts, 33 Wyo. 249, 238 P. 654,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(1925); Hitshew v. Rosson, 41 Wyo. 509, 287 P. 316,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1930).

Law reviews. —

See comment, “Application of Wyoming Statutes: Section 34-60 [§

34-2-128

] (1957) — The Possibility of Implied Tenancies Other Than Tenancies by Sufferance in Wyoming,” VI Land & Water L. Rev. 553 (1971).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Assignee's right to enforce lessor's covenant to renew or extend lease, 29 ALR2d 837.

Inclusion or exclusion of first and last days in computing time for giving notice of termination of lease which must be given a certain number of days before a known future date, 98 ALR2d 1331.

Validity and enforceability of provision for renewal of lease at rental to be fixed by subsequent agreement of the parties, 58 ALR3d 500.

Lessee's first privilege option to purchase or terms of similar import as requiring existence of prior offer from third party, 76 ALR3d 1139.

Requirements as to certainty and completeness of terms of lease in agreement to lease, 85 ALR3d 414.

Inability to obtain license, permit, or charter required for tenant's business as defense to enforcement of lease, 89 ALR3d 329.

Application of statutory landlord's lien to property of third person used by tenant on rented premises, 95 ALR3d 1205.

Life tenant's death as affecting rights under lease given by him, 14 ALR4th 1054.

Failure or delay in giving notice within specified time of intention to renew lease, 27 ALR4th 266, 29 ALR4th 903, 29 ALR4th 956, 32 ALR4th 452, 34 ALR4th 857.

Sufficiency of notice of exercise of option of renewal in lease, 27 ALR4th 266, 29 ALR4th 903, 29 ALR4th 956, 32 ALR4th 452, 34 ALR4th 857.

Second or perpetual renewal under provision for renewal of lease, 29 ALR4th 172.

Sufficiency of provision of lease to effect second or perpetual right of renewal, 29 ALR4th 172.

Sufficiency as to method of giving oral or written notice exercising option to renew or extend lease, 29 ALR4th 903.

What constitutes timely notice of exercise of option to renew or extend lease, 29 ALR4th 956.

Waiver or estoppel as to notice requirement for exercising option to renew or extend lease, 32 ALR4th 452.

Sufficiency as to parties giving or receiving notice of exercise of option to renew or extend lease, 34 ALR4th 857.

Sublessee's rights with respect to primary lessee's option to renew lease, 39 ALR4th 824.

Respective rights in excess rent when landlord relets at higher rent during lessee's term, 50 ALR4th 403.

Commercial leases: application of rule that lease may be canceled only for “material” breach, 54 ALR4th 595.

What constitutes tenant's holding over of leased premises, 13 ALR5th 169.

§ 34-2-130.
Leases; expiration of oil, gas or other mineral leases; failure to record cancellation or other termination.

If any lessee, his personal representative, successor or assign, as the case may be, after an oil, gas or other mineral lease has expired, been cancelled, surrendered, relinquished or otherwise terminated shall for the space of twenty (20) days after being thereto requested, fail, refuse or neglect to record in the office of the county clerk of the county wherein the lands described in said lease are located a recordable certificate or deed of discharge or release thereof, he shall be liable to the lessor, his heirs or assigns for all damages occasioned by such failure, refusal, or neglect, to be recovered in a civil action. The lessor’s request for discharge or release shall be in writing and delivered to the lessee by personal service or registered mail at his last known address. A letterpress or carbon or written copy of said demand, when shown to be such, may be used as evidence in any court with the same force and effect as the original.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-62; Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “county clerk” in the first sentence.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Forfeiture and Termination of Mining Leases,” I Land & Water L. Rev. 201 (1966).

§ 34-2-131.
Tax deeds; definitions.

As used in this act [§§

34-2-131

through

34-2-135

]:

“Tax deed” means any conveyance executed by or on behalf of the state, or any county, municipality, or other taxing or assessment unit thereof, which conveys or purports to convey real estate pursuant to any sale, foreclosure, forfeiture or other proceeding to satisfy the lien or indebtedness of any tax or special assessment;

“Former owner” means any person whose interest or estate has been conveyed or purportedly conveyed, or extinguished or purportedly extinguished, by execution of any tax deed, and any other persons claiming by, through or under him;

“Grantee” means the grantee named in any tax deed, and any other persons claiming by, through or under him;

“Possession” refers to possession, and to the extent of possession, as determined by the rules applicable in determining the existence of adverse possession under a written instrument constituting color of title, and includes possession by tenant or agent.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-62.1.

Cross references. —

As to deed for property sold for taxes and purchased by county, see §§

39-13-107

,

39-13-108

.

As to tax deeds in connection with real estate sold for taxes, see §§

39-13-108

,

39-13-109

.

As to deed when property sold by sheriff to enforce lien acquired by purchase at tax sales, see §

39-13-108

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

“Possession definition inapplicable to quiet title action.” —

The definition of “possession” found in subsection (a)(iv) of this section pertains only to §§

34-2-131

through

34-2-135

and cannot be applied to a determination of whether a party has complied with the possession requirement under §

1-32-201

(action to quiet title). Goodrich v. Stobbe, 908 P.2d 416,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

See comment, “Marketable Title Legislation: Tax Deeds in Wyoming,” XI Land & Water L. Rev. 419 (1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Statutory limitation of period for attack on tax deed as affected by failure to comply with statutory requirement as to notice before tax deed, 5 ALR2d 1021.

Void tax deed, tax sale certificate and the like as constituting color of title, 38 ALR2d 986.

§ 34-2-132.
Tax deeds; 2-year limitation.

No action, suit or other proceeding shall be commenced by the former owner to set aside, declare invalid or redeem from a tax deed or the sale, forfeiture, foreclosure or other proceeding upon which it is based or to recover possession, quiet title or otherwise litigate or contest the title of the grantee, if:

Two (2) years or more have elapsed after the date of recording the deed in the office of the county clerk for the county in which the real estate described in the deed is situated; and

The grantee has been in possession of the real estate continuously for a period of at least six (6) months, at any time after one (1) year and six (6) months have elapsed since the date of recording of the tax deed.

The limitation in subsection (a) of this section applies regardless of whether the tax deed or any of the proceedings upon which it is based are void or voidable for any reason, jurisdictional or otherwise. If the deed is executed substantially in the form prescribed for the execution of tax deeds, the limitation shall apply regardless of whether the deed is deemed void upon its face. The period shall not be extended by reason of the minority, insanity, imprisonment, nonresidence, or death of any person, or by reason of any other fact, or circumstance.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-62.2; Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “county clerk” in (a)(i).

Meaning of “in possession.” —

For purposes of being in possession under subsection (a)(ii), the words “in possession” mean an actual physical entry on the land; further, physical entry must be followed by the doing of acts of dominion on the land of such kind and in such manner as to indicate plainly that the entrant is acting as the owner thereof would act, considering the character of the land and the purposes for which it is adapted, the size and location of the land, and all of the attendant circumstances. Trefren v. Lewis, 852 P.2d 323,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1993).

No possession. —

Because tax deed owners did not take possession of their lots, they could not take advantage of the provisions by which the Wyoming Legislature offered protection to their tax deeds, including this section.
White v. Woods, 2009 WY 29, 2009 WY 29A,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2009).

Cited

in

Goodrich v. Stobbe, 908 P.2d 416,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 34-2-133.
Tax deeds; possession and affidavits of possession.

Possession by the grantee for a continuous period of not less than six (6) months at any time after one (1) year and six (6) months have elapsed since the date of recording the tax deed extinguishes forever all the claims, right, title and interest, including the right to possession, of the former owner, and vests in the grantee any title conveyed or purportedly conveyed by the tax deed. Proof of possession by the grantee and the record of the tax deed constitutes conclusive evidence of the legality and effectiveness of the deed and any proceedings upon which the deed is based, and of the title of the grantee. As a means of proving possession and preserving evidence of possession under a tax deed, the then owner or holder of the title conveyed or purportedly conveyed by the tax deed may, at any time after two (2) years from the date of recording of the tax deed, file for record in the office of the county clerk in which the real estate is located an affidavit substantially in the following form:

AFFIDAVIT OF POSSESSION AND CLAIM UNDER TAX DEED State of County ss I, , (name) residing at (address), being first duly sworn, depose and say that on (date) a tax deed was issued to (grantee) for the following described real estate: that said tax deed was filed for record in the office of the county clerk for county, , on (date), and appears in the records of that office in County as recorded in book page of the records; that I am now in possession of such real estate and claim title to the same by virtue of such tax deed; that I have been in possession of such real estate for a continuous period of not less than six (6) months immediately preceding the date of this affidavit; and that the facts concerning the possession of such real estate from the date of recording the tax deed to the date of this notice are, insofar as known to me, as follows: Subscribed and sworn to before me this day of , (year). Notarial Officer in and for County (state)

Click to view

In any action, suit or proceeding in which the tax deed, any proceedings upon which it is based, or the title of the grantee is contested or drawn in question, a certified copy of the record of any affidavit of possession and claim under tax deed which has been of record for not less than sixty (60) days constitutes prima facie evidence of the facts recited therein and of the application of this act [§§

34-2-131

through

34-2-135

].

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-62.3; Laws 1999, ch. 150, § 2; 2009, ch. 168, § 206; 2011, ch. 113, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the last sentence before the form, deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “county clerk” in (a).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the form in (a), deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “county clerk,” and substituted “Notarial Officer” for “Notary Public.”

§ 34-2-134.
Tax deeds; liberal construction; legislative purposes.

This act [§§

34-2-131

through

34-2-135

] shall be liberally construed to effectuate the legislative purpose of giving stability and effect to record titles, of confirming and clarifying the titles of persons in possession, of providing a means of correcting procedural and jurisdictional defects without necessity of resort to further proceedings, and of rendering tax titles marketable and protecting purchasers thereof against remote claims.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 170, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-62.4.